tr: Tekne merdiveni saklama stili: Sabit/katlanamaz; Yukarı katlanır; Katlanabilir; Platform üstü aşağı katlanır; Hızlı çıkarılabilir; Aşağı sallanır; Teleskopik/iç içe geçen; Platform altı iç içe geçen; Diğer
el: Στυλ αποθήκευσης σκάλας σκάφους: Σταθερή/μη αποθηκευόμενη; Αναδιπλούμενη προς τα πάνω; Πτυσσόμενη; Αναδιπλούμενη προς τα κάτω πάνω από την πλατφόρμα; Αφαιρούμενη γρήγορης απασφάλισης; Περιστρεφόμενη προς τα κάτω; Τηλεσκοπική/συμπτυσσόμενη; Συμπτυσσόμενη κάτω από την πλατφόρμα; Άλλο
nl: Boatladder stijl: Vast/niet-opbergbaar; Opklapbaar; Opvouwbaar; Boven platform neerklapbaar; Verwijderbaar met quick-release; Neerklapbaar; Telescopisch/intrekbaar; Onder platform intrekbaar; Overige
pt-BR: Estilo de armazenamento da escada do barco: Fixo/não retrátil; Basculante; Dobrável; Dobrável sobre a plataforma; Removível com engate rápido; Rebatível para baixo; Telescópico/retrátil; Retrátil sob a plataforma; Outros
en: Boat ladder stowage style: Fixed/non-stowable; Flip-up; Folding; Over-platform fold-down; Quick-release removable; Swing-down; Telescoping/retractable; Under-platform retractable; Other
it: stile di stivaggio della scala per barca: Fissa/non riponibile; Ribaltabile; Pieghevole; Pieghevole sopra la plancetta; Rimovibile a sgancio rapido; Basculante; Telescopica/retrattile; Retrattile sotto la plancetta; Altro
vi: Kiểu cất giữ thang thuyền: Cố định/không thể cất gọn; Lật lên; Gấp gọn; Gập xuống trên sàn; Tháo rời bằng khóa tháo nhanh; Gạt xuống; Kéo dài/thu gọn; Thu gọn dưới sàn; Khác
fi: Venetikkaiden säilytystyyli: Kiinteä / ei varastoitavissa; Käännettävä; Taitettava; Tason yli taittuva; Pikakiinnitteinen, irrotettava; Alas kääntyvä; Teleskooppinen/sisäänvedettävä; Tason alle sisäänvedettävä; Muu
cs: Způsob uložení lodního žebříku: Pevné / nelze složit; Výklopné nahoru; Skládací; Sklápěcí přes plošinu; Odnímatelné s rychloupínáním; Sklápěcí dolů; Teleskopické/zasouvací; Zasouvací pod plošinu; Jiné
zh-CN: 船用梯收纳方式: 固定/不可收纳; 向上翻转; 折叠; 平台上方折叠; 快拆可拆卸; 向下摆动; 伸缩/可伸缩; 平台下方可伸缩; 其他
sk-SK: Spôsob uloženia lodného rebríka: Pevné/neskladacie; Výklopné; Skladacie; Sklápacie nad plošinou; Rýchloupínacie odnímateľné; Sklápacie; Teleskopické/zaťahovacie; Zaťahovacie pod plošinu; Iné
da: Lejderens opbevaringsstil: Fast/kan ikke pakkes væk; Kan vippes op; Foldbar; Foldes ned over platform; Aftagelig med quick-release; Svinges ned; Teleskopisk/kan trækkes tilbage; Kan trækkes tilbage under platform; Andet
ja: ボート用はしごの収納スタイル: 固定/収納不可; フリップアップ; 折りたたみ式; プラットフォーム上折りたたみ式; クイックリリース取り外し式; スイングダウン; 伸縮/格納式; プラットフォーム下格納式; その他
zh-TW: 船梯收納樣式: 固定式/不可收納; 上翻式; 摺疊式; 平台上方折疊式; 快拆可卸式; 下擺式; 伸縮/可收縮式; 平台下方收縮式; 其他
ru: Тип хранения лестницы для лодки: Фиксированный/неубирающийся; Откидной вверх; Складной; Складной над платформой; Быстросъёмный; Откидной вниз; Телескопический/выдвижной; Выдвижной под платформой; Другое
pt-PT: Estilo de armazenamento da escada do barco: Fixo/não armazenável; Rebatível; Dobrável; Rebatível sobre a plataforma; Amovível de libertação rápida; Basculante para baixo; Telescópico/retrátil; Retrátil sob a plataforma; Outro
th: รูปแบบการจัดเก็บบันไดเรือ: ติดตั้งถาวร/พับเก็บไม่ได้; พับขึ้น; พับได้; พับลงเหนือแพลตฟอร์ม; ถอดออกได้แบบปลดเร็ว; สวิงลง; ยืดหดได้/พับเก็บได้; พับเก็บใต้แพลตฟอร์ม; อื่นๆ
ko: 보트 사다리 보관 방식: 고정형/보관 불가; 플립업; 접이식; 플랫폼 위 접이식; 퀵릴리스 탈착식; 스윙다운; 텔레스코픽/수축식; 플랫폼 아래 수축식; 기타
sl-SI: Slog shranjevanja lestve za čolne: Fiksno/nezložljivo; Zložljivo navzgor; Zložljivo; Zložljivo navzdol čez platformo; Snemljivo (hitra sprostitev); Nihajno navzdol; Teleskopsko/izvlečno; Izvlečno pod platformo; Drugo
bg-BG: Начин на съхранение на стълбата за лодка: Фиксирана/несгъваема; Сгъваема нагоре; Сгъваема; Сгъваема надолу над платформата; Сваляща се с бързо освобождаване; Спускаща се надолу; Телескопична/прибираща се; Прибираща се под платформата; Друго
ro-RO: Stil de depozitare a scărilor pentru bărci: Fix/nepliabil; Rabatabil în sus; Pliabil; Rabatabil peste platformă; Detașabil cu eliberare rapidă; Rabatabil în jos; Telescopic/retractabil; Retractabil sub platformă; Altele
lt-LT: Valties kopėčių laikymo tipas: Fiksuotos / nesudedamos; Atlenkiamos į viršų; Sulankstomos; Nulenkiamos ant platformos; Nuimamos (greitai atlaisvinamos); Nulenkiamos; Teleskopinės / išstumiamos; Išstumiamos po platforma; Kitas
de: Verstauart der Bootsleiter: Fest/nicht verstaubar; Hochklappbar; Faltbar; Über der Plattform herunterklappbar; Mit Schnellspanner abnehmbar; Herunterschwenkbar; Teleskopierbar/einziehbar; Unter der Plattform einziehbar; Sonstige
fr: Mode de rangement de l’échelle de bateau: Fixe/non escamotable; Relevable; Pliable; Rabattable sur la plateforme; Amovible à dégagement rapide; Pivotante vers le bas; Télescopique/rétractable; Rétractable sous la plateforme; Autre
hr-HR: Stil skladištenja za brodske ljestve: Fiksne / ne mogu se spremiti; Preklopne prema gore; Sklopive; Preklopne preko platforme (prema dolje); Uklonjive s brzim otpuštanjem; Okretne prema dolje; Teleskopske/uvlačne; Uvlačne ispod platforme; Ostalo
nb: Oppbevaringsstil for båtstige: Fast / ikke-sammenleggbar; Vippbar; Sammenleggbar; Nedfellbar over plattform; Hurtigutløsende avtakbar; Utsvingbar; Teleskopisk/inntrekkbar; Inntrekkbar under plattform; Annet
pl: Styl przechowywania drabinki łodziowej: Stała / nieskładana; Odchylana; Składana; Składana na platformę; Zdejmowana (szybkozłącze); Opuszczana; Teleskopowa / wysuwana; Wysuwana spod platformy; Inne
hu: Hajólétra tárolási módja: Rögzített/nem eltehető; Felhajtható; Összecsukható; Platform fölé lehajtható; Gyorskioldós levehető; Lehajtható; Teleszkópos/visszahúzható; Platform alá visszahúzható; Egyéb
es: Estilo de almacenamiento de la escalera de embarcación: Fijo/no almacenable; Abatible hacia arriba; Plegable; Plegable sobre la plataforma; Desmontable de liberación rápida; Abatible hacia abajo; Telescópico/retráctil; Retráctil bajo la plataforma; Otro
sv: Förvaringsstil för båtstege: Fast/ej fällbar; Uppfällbar; Hopfällbar; Fälls ner över plattform; Avtagbar med snabbfäste; Nedfällbar; Teleskopisk/infällbar; Infällbar under plattform; Annan